Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 4

State Chemical Laboratory [Repealed]

43-1-401 — 43-1-406. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 43-1-401 — 43-1-406 (Acts 1913, ch. 22, §§ 1-5, 7; Code 1932, §§ 520-525; Shan., §§ 325a82-325a86, 325a88; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 43-401 — 43-406, 43-4-101 — 43-4-106), concerning the state chemical laboratory, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 878, § 20.